Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7523
Advisory organizations; general filing requirements applicable.

Filings by an advisory organization of prospective loss costs, rating systems or policy forms and related attachment rules shall be subject to the provisions of the Property and Casualty Insurance Rate and Form Act applicable to filings generally. Rating system filings by an advisory organization shall be subject to the provisions of sections 44-7510 and 44-7511.

Laws 2000, LB 1119, § 23.